Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-275.07
Cotenancy; when presumed.

When any conveyance of a present interest in real estate is made to more than one person and the grantees are named in the disjunctive, the conveyance shall be conclusively presumed to create a cotenancy in all the named grantees.

Laws 1981, LB 96, § 1.